Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 4 Harbors and Harbor Lines
46-4-6.17.
Town of Westerly — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Westerly, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Westerly to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit water-skiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the towns the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of said town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-7.
Town of East Providence — Powers conferred.

In addition to any authority and powers conferred upon city or town councils by this title, the city council of East Providence is hereby further authorized to regulate by ordinance speed limits, management, and control of all vessels on the public waters within the jurisdiction of the city, the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings, fix permit fees for anchorages and moorings, and to provide penalties, in accordance with the provisions of §

46-4-4

, for the violation of any of the provisions of the ordinances pertaining thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 236, § 3.

46-4-8.
Authority reserved to the state director of the department of environmental management.

The provisions of §§

46-4-5

—

46-4-7

shall not supersede the authority and jurisdiction over the public tidewaters of this state which are vested in the state director of the department of environmental management under this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 236, § 3.